Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
AVIATION
SECTION 1.  ORS 319.023 is amended to read:
319.023. (1) The following amounts shall be distributed in the  manner prescribed in this section:
(a) Any  amount of tax on aircraft fuel usable in aircraft operated by turbine engines that is
computed on a basis in excess of one cent  per gallon and any amount of tax on all other aircraft
fuel that is computed on a basis in excess of nine cents per gallon, under ORS 319.020 (2); and
(b) Any amount of tax on aircraft fuel usable in aircraft operated  by turbine engines in excess
of one cent per gallon and any amount  of tax on all other aircraft fuel in excess of nine cents per
gallon, that is deducted before the refunding of tax under ORS 319.330 (1).
(2)(a) Applications for distributions under subsection (5)  of this section may not be approved
unless the applicant demonstrates a commitment to contribute at least five percent of the  costs of
the project  to which the application relates. The Oregon Department of Aviation shall adopt rules
for purposes of this paragraph.
(b) The department may adopt rules that:
(A) Set higher minimum contribution commitment requirements; or
(B) Establish maximum grant amounts.
(3)(a) The State Aviation Board shall establish a  review committee composed of one member
from each of the area commissions on transportation chartered by the Oregon Transportation Com-
mission.
(b) The review committee shall meet as necessary to review applications  for distributions of
amounts pursuant to this section. In reviewing applications, the review committee shall consider:
(A) Whether a proposed project:
(i) Reduces transportation costs for Oregon businesses or  improves access to jobs and sources
of labor in this state;
(ii) Results in an economic benefit to this state;
(iii) Connects elements of Oregon’s aviation system in  a way that will measurably improve
utilization and efficiency of the system;
Enrolled House Bill 4109 (HB 4109-A) Page 1
(iv) Is ready for construction or implementation; and
(v) Has a useful life expectancy that offers maximum benefit to this state; and
(B) How much of the cost  of the proposed project can be borne by the applicant from sources
other than Oregon Department of Aviation funds or the Connect Oregon Fund.
(c) The review committee shall recommend  applications to the State Aviation Board for ap-
proval.
(4)(a) Five  percent of the amounts described in subsection (1) of this section are appropriated
to the  Oregon Department of Aviation for the costs of the department and the State Aviation Board
in administering this section.
(b) The remaining 95 percent of the amounts described in subsection (1) of this section shall be
distributed pursuant to subsections (5) and (6) of this section.
(5)(a) Seventy-five percent of the  amounts described in subsection (4)(b) of this section shall be
distributed for the following purposes:
(A) To assist airports  in Oregon with match requirements for Federal Aviation Administration
[Airport Improvement Program ] grants.
(B) To make grants for emergency preparedness  and infrastructure projects, in accordance with
the Oregon Resilience Plan or the Oregon Aviation Plan.
(C) To make grants for:
(i) Services critical or essential to aviation, including, but  not limited to, fuel, sewer, water and
weather equipment;
(ii) Aviation-related  business development, including, but not limited to, hangars, parking for
business aircraft and related facilities; or
(iii) Airport development for local economic benefit, including, but  not limited to, signs and
marketing.
(D)(i) To assist commercial air service to rural Oregon.
(ii) The  Oregon Department of Aviation may adopt a definition of “rural Oregon” for purposes
of this subparagraph.
(b) The State Aviation Board may establish by rule priorities for the distributions made pursuant
to this subsection.
(6) Twenty-five percent of the amounts described in subsection (4)(b) of this  section shall be
distributed to state-owned airports for the purposes of:
(a) Safety improvements recommended by the State  Aviation Board and local community air-
ports.
(b) Infrastructure projects at public use airports.
(7)(a) Not later than  September 15 of each year, the State Aviation Board shall submit the re-
ports described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, in the manner provided in  ORS 192.245, to the
interim committees, as applicable, of the Legislative Assembly related to air transportation.
(b) The reports required under this subsection shall describe in detail the projects for which
applications have been submitted and approved, the airports affected, the names of the  applicants
and the persons who will perform the work proposed in the applications,  the progress of projects for
which applications have been approved and any other information the board considers necessary  for
a comprehensive analysis of the implementation of this section.
PHOTO RADAR
SECTION 2.
 ORS 810.444 is amended to read:
810.444. (1)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in [ the jurisdiction ] a city  operating a
[fixed] photo radar system under ORS [ 810.443] 810.438:
(a) A citation for speeding may be issued on the basis of [ fixed] photo radar if:
(A) A sign that provides drivers with information about the driver’s current rate of  speed is
posted between 100 and 400 yards before the location of each [ fixed] photo radar unit; [ and]
Enrolled House Bill 4109 (HB 4109-A) Page 2
[(B) A police officer or a duly authorized traffic enforcement agent who has reviewed the photo-
graphic evidence of the conduct signs the citation. ]
(B) A police officer or a duly authorized traffic  enforcement agent has reviewed the
photographic evidence of the conduct; and
(C) A police officer signs and issues the citation, except that a citation issued  by the City
of Portland may be  signed and issued by a duly authorized traffic enforcement agent or a
police officer.
(b) A rebuttable presumption exists that the  registered owner of the vehicle was the driver of
the vehicle when the citation is issued and delivered as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(c) An individual issued a citation under this subsection may respond to the citation by sub-
mitting a certificate of innocence  under subsection (3)(a) of this section or may make any other re-
sponse allowed by law.
(d) A business or public agency issued a citation under this subsection  may respond to the ci-
tation by submitting an affidavit of  nonliability under subsection (3)(b) of this section or may make
any other response allowed by law.
(2) A citation  issued on the basis of [ fixed] photo radar may be delivered by mail or otherwise
to the registered owner of the vehicle or  to the driver. The citation may be prepared on a digital
medium, and the signature may be electronic in accordance with  the provisions of ORS 84.001 to
84.061.
(3)(a) An individual named  as the registered owner of a vehicle in current records of the De-
partment of Transportation may respond  by mail to a citation issued under subsection (1) of this
section by submitting a  certificate of innocence within 30 days from the mailing of the citation
swearing or affirming that the registered owner was not the driver of the  vehicle and by providing
a photocopy of the registered owner’s driver license. A [ jurisdiction] city  that  receives a certificate
of innocence under this paragraph shall  dismiss the citation without requiring a court appearance
by the registered owner or any other  information from the registered owner other than the swearing
or affirmation and the photocopy.  The citation may be reissued only once, only to the registered
owner and only if the [ jurisdiction] city  verifies that  the registered owner appears to have been the
driver at the time of the violation. A registered owner may not submit a  certificate of innocence in
response to a reissued citation.
(b) If a  business or public agency named as the registered owner of a vehicle in current records
of the Department of Transportation responds to a citation issued under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion by submitting  an affidavit of nonliability within 30 days from the mailing of the citation stating
that at the time of the alleged  speeding violation the vehicle was in the custody and control of an
employee, or was in the custody and control of a renter or lessee  under the terms of a rental
agreement or  lease, and if the business or public agency provides the driver license number, name
and address of the employee, renter or lessee,  the citation shall be dismissed with respect to the
business or public agency. The  citation may then be issued and delivered by mail or otherwise to
the employee, renter or lessee identified in the affidavit of nonliability.
(4) If the registered owner, employee, renter or lessee fails to respond to a citation  issued under
this section, a default judgment under ORS 153.102 may be entered for failure to appear after  notice
has been given that the judgment will be entered.
(5) The  penalties for and all consequences of a speeding violation initiated by the use of [ fixed]
photo radar are the same as for a speeding violation initiated by any other means.
(6) A registered owner, employee, renter or lessee against whom a judgment for failure to appear
is entered may move the court to relieve the registered owner, employee, renter or  lessee from the
judgment as  provided in ORS 153.105 if the failure to appear was due to mistake, inadvertence,
surprise or excusable neglect.
(7)[(a)] As used in this section[ ,]:
(a)(A) “Duly authorized traffic enforcement agent” means an individual who:
[(A)] (i) Is employed, appointed and duly sworn in by  the governing body of the incorporated
city in which the agent performs the agent’s duties; and
Enrolled House Bill 4109 (HB 4109-A) Page 3
[(B)] (ii) Has completed all necessary technical, administrative and other training to :
(I) Review photographs [ and] under this section; and
(II) Issue and sign  citations under this section , if employed by the City of Portland .
[(b)] (B) Duly authorized traffic enforcement agents are not police officers.
(b) “Police officer” includes “reserve officers” as defined in ORS 133.005.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 153.083 is amended to read:
153.083. (1) Notwithstanding ORS  9.160 and 9.320, in any trial of a violation, whether created
by ordinance or statute, in which a city  attorney or district attorney does not appear, the peace
officer who issued the citation for the offense may present evidence, examine  and cross-examine
witnesses and make arguments relating to:
(a) The application of statutes and rules to the facts in the case;
(b) The literal meaning of the statutes or rules at issue in the case;
(c) The admissibility of evidence; and
(d) Proper procedures to be used in the trial.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 9.160 and 9.320, in any trial of a violation, whether created by ordi-
nance or statute, in which a city attorney or district attorney does not appear, the duly authorized
traffic enforcement agent  who issued the citation for the offense may present the evidence reviewed
by the agent as the basis for issuing a citation under ORS 810.436, 810.437 or 810.444.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 9.160 and 9.320, in any trial of a violation, whether created by ordi-
nance or statute, in which a city attorney or district attorney does not appear, the weighmaster  or
motor carrier enforcement officer who issued the citation for  the offense may present the evidence
reviewed by the weighmaster or motor carrier enforcement officer as the basis for issuing  a citation
listed under ORS 810.530.
(4)(a) As used in this section, “duly authorized traffic  enforcement agent” means an individual
who:
(A) Is employed, appointed and duly sworn in by the governing body  of the incorporated city in
which the agent performs the agent’s duties; and
(B) Has completed all necessary technical, administrative  and other training to review photo-
graphs and issue citations under ORS 810.436, 810.437 or 810.444.
(b) Duly authorized traffic enforcement agents are not police officers as defined in ORS  801.395
or reserve officers as defined in ORS 133.005 .
SECTION 4.
ORS 810.439, 810.443 and 810.445 are repealed.
SECTION 5.  ORS 153.054 is amended to read:
153.054. Except as provided in ORS 267.153, [ 810.439] 810.444, 811.590, 811.615 or 811.617 or
other law, an  enforcement officer issuing a violation citation shall cause the summons to be deliv-
ered to the person cited and shall cause the complaint and abstract of court record to be  delivered
to the court.
COMPRESSED NATURAL GAS FUELING AT DAS FLEET CENTER
SECTION 6.  Section 14, chapter  30, Oregon Laws 2010, as amended by section 2, chapter 526,
Oregon Laws 2013, and section 1, chapter 67, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 14.  Section 13, chapter 30, Oregon Laws 2010, is repealed on January 2, [ 2025] 2026.
FAMILY PLACARDS
SECTION 7.  ORS 811.609 is amended to read:
811.609. (1) The Department of Transportation  shall issue disabled person parking permits in the
form of family placards for use on vehicles that are regularly used by :
(a) A family that includes  [ more than one person with a disability ] at least two persons with
disabilities; or
(b) Multiple households that are caring for at least one person with a disability .
Enrolled House Bill 4109 (HB 4109-A) Page 4
(2) All the following apply to placards issued under this section:
[(1)] (a)  The department shall determine the form, size and content of  the placards except that
the department shall require that the expiration date of a  placard be visible when the placard is
displayed in the vehicle.
[(2)] (b)  Placards issued under this section shall be valid for a period of eight years from the
date of issue. Upon expiration,  placards may be renewed in a manner determined by the department
by rule.
[(3)] (c)  The  department [ shall] may  not issue or renew a placard under this section unless a
licensed physician certifies that :
(A) The family includes at least two persons with disabilities ; or
(B) Multiple households are caring for at least one person with a disability .
SECTION 8. The amendments to ORS 811.609 by section 7 of this 2024 Act  apply to family
placards issued on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
CHARGE AHEAD OREGON PROGRAM
SECTION 9.  ORS 468.446 is amended to read:
468.446. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Charge ahead rebate” means a rebate for the  purchase or lease of a new or used light-duty
zero-emission vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric  vehicle issued through the Charge Ahead Oregon
Program established under this section.
(b) “Low-income service provider” means an organization that provides health, dental,  social,
financial, energy conservation or other assistive services to  low or moderate income individuals or
low or moderate income households, as further defined by the  Environmental Quality Commission
by rule.
(c) “Qualifying household” means  a household with income that does not exceed 400 percent of
federal poverty guidelines.
(2) The Department of Environmental Quality shall establish a Charge Ahead Oregon Program
for providing charge ahead rebates to qualifying households and low-income  service providers. The
Director of the Department of Environmental Quality may  hire or contract with a third-party or-
ganization to implement and serve as the administrator of the program required by this section.
(3) The department may:
(a) Specify design features for the program; and
(b) Establish procedures to:
(A) Prioritize available moneys to specific income levels or geographic areas; and
(B) Limit the number of charge ahead rebates available.
(4) An eligible  purchaser or lessee of a new or used light-duty zero-emission vehicle or plug-in
hybrid electric vehicle may apply for  a charge ahead rebate for a portion of the purchase price or
may choose to assign the charge ahead rebate to a vehicle dealer or lessor.
(5) Rebates under the Charge Ahead Oregon Program  shall be made from moneys credited to
or deposited in  the Zero-Emission Incentive Fund established under ORS 468.449  or the Charge
Ahead Zero-Emission Incentive  Fund established under section 13 of this 2024 Act . A rebate
may not be made [ until] unless  there are sufficient moneys available [ in the fund ] to make the re-
bate.
(6) The department shall prescribe  the rebate application procedure for eligible purchasers and
lessees. All rebate applications must include a  declaration under penalty of perjury in the form re-
quired by ORCP 1 E.
(7) [ Charge ahead rebates shall  be in an amount up to $5,000, but not less than $2,500. ] Charge
ahead rebates shall be:
(a) Up to  $7,500 for the purchase or lease of a new light-duty zero-emission vehicle or
plug-in hybrid electric vehicle, but not less than $2,500; or
Enrolled House Bill 4109 (HB 4109-A) Page 5
(b) Up to $5,000 for  the purchase or lease of a used light-duty zero-emission vehicle or
plug-in hybrid electric vehicle, but not less than $2,500.
(8) To  be eligible for a charge ahead rebate, a person requesting a rebate under the program
must:
(a) Be a member of a qualifying household or be a low-income service provider.
(b) Purchase or lease  a new or used light-duty zero-emission vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric
vehicle. A lease must have a minimum term of 24 months.
(c) Provide proof of an intent to use the  light-duty zero-emission vehicle or plug-in hybrid elec-
tric vehicle primarily on the public highways  of this state, which may be satisfied by providing proof
of registration of the vehicle in Oregon.
(d) Submit an application for a charge ahead rebate to the administrator of the program within
six months of the date of purchase or six months from the date the lease begins.
(e) Retain registration of the  light-duty zero-emission vehicle for a minimum of 24 consecutive
months following the date of purchase or following the date the lease begins.
(9) A person that receives  a charge ahead rebate may not make or allow any modifications to
the vehicle’s emissions control systems, hardware, software calibrations or hybrid system.
(10)(a) If a charge ahead rebate recipient sells the vehicle or terminates the  vehicle lease before
the end of 24 months, the charge ahead rebate recipient shall:
(A) Notify the administrator of the program of the sale or termination; and
(B) Reimburse the administrator for the rebate in a prorated amount  based on the number of
months that the rebate recipient owned or leased the qualifying vehicle.
(b) The administrator may waive the reimbursement requirement under paragraph  (a) of this
subsection if the administrator determines that a waiver is appropriate given unforeseeable  or una-
voidable circumstances that gave  rise to a need for the rebate recipient to sell the qualifying vehicle
or terminate the qualifying vehicle lease before the end of 24 months.
(11) Charge ahead rebate recipients may be requested to participate in ongoing research efforts.
(12) The administrator of the program shall work to  ensure timely payment of charge ahead
rebates with a goal of paying rebates within 60 days of receiving  an application for a charge ahead
rebate.
(13) In establishing the  Charge Ahead Oregon Program, the department shall provide opportu-
nities for public comment  by qualifying households, low-income service providers and other
community-based organizations that are located in areas of this state that  have elevated concen-
trations of air contaminants  attributable to motor vehicle emissions, relative to other areas of the
state. The department shall use the  comments received pursuant to this subsection to inform, eval-
uate and strengthen  the design of the program in order to increase the usage of light-duty zero-
emission vehicles and plug-in hybrid electric vehicles.
(14) The administrator of  the program shall, throughout the course of implementing the program,
conduct community outreach to qualifying households, low-income service providers and other
community-based organizations that are  located in areas of this state that have elevated concen-
trations of air contaminants attributable to motor vehicle emissions, relative to other  areas of the
state, in order to:
(a) Solicit feedback on program implementation; and
(b) Take steps to ensure that the program is promoted effectively.
(15) A vehicle dealer may advertise  the Charge Ahead Oregon Program on the premises owned
or operated by the vehicle  dealer. If no moneys are available from the program or the program
otherwise changes, a vehicle dealer who advertises the program may not be  held liable for adver-
tising false or misleading information.
(16) A charge ahead rebate may  not  be combined with a rebate described in ORS 468.444.
(17) An organization  that the department has hired or contracted with to implement and serve
as the administrator of the program  may offer expanded financing mechanisms for program partic-
ipants, including, but not  limited to, a loan or loan-loss reserve credit enhancement program to in-
Enrolled House Bill 4109 (HB 4109-A) Page 6
crease  consumer  access to new or used light-duty zero-emission vehicles and plug-in hybrid electric
vehicles.
(18) The Environmental Quality Commission may  adopt any rules necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 10.  ORS 468.448 is amended to read:
468.448. (1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall periodically  audit, or cause to be
audited, the programs established under ORS 468.444 and 468.446 to determine whether the programs
are being implemented  and administered in compliance with the provisions of ORS 468.442 to
468.449.
(2) No later than September 15 of each even-numbered year, the  department shall provide a re-
port to  the Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, that includes, at a mini-
mum:
(a) A description of the uses to date of moneys in the  Zero-Emission Incentive Fund established
under ORS 468.449;
(b) An analysis of the effectiveness of the rebate program established under ORS 468.444;
(c) A description of the uses to date  of moneys in the Charge Ahead Zero-Emission In-
centive Fund established under section 13 of this 2024 Act;
[(c)] (d) An analysis of the effectiveness of the Charge  Ahead Oregon Program established under
ORS 468.446;
[(d)] (e)  Recommendations, which  may include recommendations for legislation, on ways to im-
prove the programs established under ORS 468.444 and 468.446; and
[(e)] (f)  The results of any audits conducted under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 468.449 is amended to read:
468.449. (1) The Zero-Emission Incentive Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Zero-Emission Incentive  Fund shall be cred-
ited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Zero-Emission Incentive Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts transferred to the fund by the Department of Revenue under ORS 320.435;
(c) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(d) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any public or private source; and
(e) Interest earned by the fund.
(3) The Department of  Environmental Quality shall encourage gifts, grants, donations or other
contributions to the fund.
(4) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the department to be used to carry out
the provisions of ORS 468.442 to 468.449.
(5)(a) No more than 10 percent of the moneys deposited in the  fund per biennium may be ex-
pended to pay administrative expenses incurred in the administration of ORS 468.442 to 468.449 by:
(A) The department; and
(B) Any third-party  organization that the department hires or contracts with under ORS 468.444
and 468.446.
(b) As used in this subsection, “administrative expenses” does not include expenses  incurred by
the department or third-party organizations in:
(A) Conducting community outreach under ORS 468.446 (14); or
(B) Otherwise engaging in efforts to promote transportation  electrification through participation
in the programs established under ORS 468.444 and 468.446.
(6)(a) The Environmental  Quality Commission may adopt by rule provisions for the allocation
of moneys deposited in the fund between the programs established under ORS 468.444 and 468.446.
(b) Rules adopted under this subsection must require that at least 20 percent  of the moneys
deposited in the fund  per biennium are allocated to fund the provision of rebates through the Charge
Ahead Oregon Program established under ORS 468.446.
Enrolled House Bill 4109 (HB 4109-A) Page 7
(c) The  amount required to be allocated under paragraph (b) of this subsection in any
biennium shall be reduced, but not below zero, by the amount deposited from any  other
source in the Charge Ahead Zero-Emission Incentive Fund established under section 13 of
this 2024 Act.
SECTION 12.
Section 13 of this 2024 Act is  added to and made a part of ORS 468.442 to
468.449.
SECTION 13. (1) The Charge Ahead Zero-Emission Incentive Fund is established  in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the  General Fund. Interest earned by the Charge
Ahead Zero-Emission Incentive Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Charge Ahead Zero-Emission Incentive Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts  appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any public or private source; and
(d) Interest earned by the fund.
(3) The Department of Environmental Quality shall encourage gifts,  grants, donations
or other contributions to the fund.
(4) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the department to be used to:
(a) Provide charge ahead rebates under ORS 468.446; and
(b) Pay administrative expenses incurred in  the administration of ORS 468.442 to 468.449
by:
(A) The department; and
(B) Any third-party organization  that the department hires or contracts with under ORS
468.444 and 468.446.
(5) No more  than 10 percent of the moneys deposited in the fund per biennium may be
expended to pay administrative expenses incurred by  the department and any third-party
organization.
(6) As used in  this section, “administrative expenses” does not include expenses incurred
by the department or third-party organizations in:
(a) Conducting community outreach under ORS 468.446 (14); or
(b) Otherwise engaging in efforts to promote transportation electrification through par-
ticipation in the programs established under ORS 468.444 and 468.446.
RAIL
SECTION 14.
(1) The Department of Transportation shall pursue cooperative efforts with
the State of Idaho  to apply for assistance from the Federal Railroad Administration to study
potential for reestablishing service on the Amtrak Pioneer Line.
(2) The department shall report on the progress to carry out the  provisions of subsection
(1) of this section in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245 to the Joint Committee on Trans-
portation no later than December 31, 2024.
SECTION 15. Section 14 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 16. The unit captions  used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
Enrolled House Bill 4109 (HB 4109-A) Page 8
SECTION 17. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4109 (HB 4109-A) Page 9